Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1530
Ineligible voter; illegal voting; penalty.

Any person who votes (1) who is not a resident of this state or registered in the county or who at the time of election is not of the constitutionally prescribed age of a registered voter, (2) who is not a citizen of the United States, or (3) after being disqualified by law by reason of his or her conviction of a felony and prior to completing the sentence, including any parole term, shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 429;

Laws 2005, LB 53, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB20, § 6.